Louisiana, session 2026, SB315.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 38:2316 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§2316. Applicability
Except as provided in R.S. 38:2311(C), the provisions of this Part shall not
apply to professional service contracts in which the estimated project budget cost is
one two million dollars or less. Any agency that enters into more than one
professional services contract in any given fiscal year shall ensure that not less
than fifty percent of the total number of such contracts are awarded to separate,
distinct, and unaffiliated professional services firms if such contracts are
exempt pursuant to the provisions of this Section.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2026; if vetoed by the governor
and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become effective on the day
following such approval by the legislature or July 1, 2026, whichever is later.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.